District of Columbia statutes.
46-353.14

Limited immunity of petitioner.

(a)

Participation by a petitioner in a proceeding under this chapter before a responding tribunal, whether in person, by private attorney, or through services provided by the support enforcement agency, does not confer personal jurisdiction over the petitioner in another proceeding.

(b)

A petitioner is not amenable to service of civil process while physically present in the District to participate in a proceeding under this chapter.

(c)

The immunity granted by this section does not extend to civil litigation based on acts unrelated to a proceeding under this chapter committed by a party while physically present in the District to participate in the proceeding.

History

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 314, 63 DCR 222